North Carolina, session 2025, HB809.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(1b) A local board of education participating in the NC Prekindergarten (NC
Pre-K) program shall include NC Pre-K students receiving instruction from
an NC Pre-K program located in a building owned by a local school
administrative unit in the average daily membership for that local school
administrative unit."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H809-v-1*